Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-450
Permit to hunt elk; regulation and limitation by commission; issuance; fee; violation; penalty.

(1) The commission may issue permits for hunting elk and may adopt and promulgate separate and, when necessary, different rules and regulations therefor within the limitations prescribed in sections 37-447 and 37-452 for hunting deer.

(2) The commission shall, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge (a) a nonrefundable application fee of not more than twelve dollars for a resident elk permit and not to exceed three times such amount for a nonresident elk permit and (b) a fee of not more than one hundred ninety-eight dollars for each resident elk permit issued and three times such amount for each nonresident elk permit issued. The commission may, pursuant to section 37-327, establish and charge a fee of not more than twenty-four dollars for residents and not more than seventy-two dollars for nonresidents for the issuance of a preference point or a bonus point, in addition to any application fee. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for issuing a preference point or bonus point.

(3) An applicant shall not be issued a resident elk permit that allows the harvest of an antlered elk more than once every five years. A person may only harvest one antlered elk in his or her lifetime except when harvesting an antlered elk with a limited permit to hunt elk pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of section 37-455 or an auction or lottery permit pursuant to section 37-455.01.

(4) The provisions for the distribution of deer permits and the authority of the commission to determine eligibility of applicants for permits as described in sections 37-447 and 37-452 shall also apply to the distribution of elk permits.

(5) Any person violating the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least two hundred dollars upon conviction.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 160;

Laws 2003, LB 306, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 17;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB94, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 13;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 12.
July 18, 2026